Maryland, session 2025, HB0322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
2–103.
(a) There is a State Administrator of Elections.
(E) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR MAY ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH A MUNICIPALITY MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, THE TERMS OF
WHICH SHALL ALLOW THE ADMINISTRATOR TO WORK COLLABORATIVELY WITH THE
MUNICIPALITY MUNICIPAL CORPORATION TO SUPPORT THE ADMINISTRATION OF
THE MUNICIPALITY’S MUNICIPAL CORPORATION’S ELECTIONS.
(F) (1) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR MAY LEASE A VOTING SYSTEM OR
ANY OTHER EQUIPMENT USED TO ADMINISTER AN ELECTION TO A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION FOR USE IN A MUNICIPAL ELECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH A
MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING ENTERED INTO UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL:
(I) DETERMINE THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE LEASE;
AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE PROCEEDS OF THE LEASE TO THE FAIR
CAMPAIGN FINANCING FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 15–103 OF THIS ARTICLE.
9–105.
[(a)] Acquisition of a voting system shall be by purchase, lease, or rental and shall
be exempt from State, county, or municipal taxation.
[(b) (1) A local board may lease a voting system to any governmental or
nongovernmental entity within the county.
(2) The local board shall determine the terms and conditions of the lease.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 124
(3) The local board shall pay to the governing body of the county, within 30
days of receipt, the proceeds of the lease.]
Article – Local Government
4–108.3.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Ballot” means a ballot prepared by the State Board of Elections under
Title 9 of the Election Law Article.
(3) “State Board” means the State Board of Elections.
(b) A municipality may request that the State Board include on a ballot the offices
and questions to be voted on in a municipal election.
(c) (1) A municipality that makes a request under this section shall:
(i) file the request with the State Board on or before the day that is
[18] 9 months before the deadline date applicable for individuals who are required to file a
certificate of candidacy as required under § 5–303 of the Election Law Article; and
(ii) certify as part of the request that the charter of the municipality
requires, and the municipality has established, deadlines and procedures for the
administration of municipal elections for the municipality that are consistent with the
deadlines and procedures for State and county elections established by the State Board
with regard to:
1. the filing of certificates of candidacy;
2. the filling of a vacancy in office;
3. the filing of a petition; [and]
4. the certification of a ballot question;
5. VOTER REGISTRATION; AND
6. VOTING.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, if the
State Board previously included a municipal election on the ballot, that municipality’s
elections may continue to appear on the ballot without the municipality filing an additional
request under this section.
– 3 –

Ch. 124 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A municipality shall file a request under this section if, since the
municipality’s election last appeared on the ballot, there has been a significant change in
the method the municipality uses to conduct its elections.
(3) Within 30 days after receipt of a municipality’s request under this
section, the State Board, after consultation with the local board in the county where the
municipality is located, shall notify the municipality of its decision whether to include the
municipal election on the ballot.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 4 –